Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-152
Employable recipients; programs authorized.

A county may develop, establish, and implement vocational, rehabilitation, job training, and community service programs for employable recipients.

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 2.